Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1574.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 8, article 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-875, to read: START_STATUTE15-875. Immunization rates; disclosure requirements A. On request by a pupil's parent, a school district or charter school shall provide the most recent aggregated immunization rates for the school, as reported to the department of health services pursuant to section 15-874. B. This section does not require a school district or charter school to release the personally identifiable information of any pupil. END_STATUTE